Maryland, session 2025, SB0631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
SUBTITLE 10. COMMISSION ON ABANDONED AND NEGLECTED MARYLAND
CEMETERIES.
5–1001.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0631*

SENATE BILL 631
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COMMISSION” MEANS THE COMMISSION ON ABANDONED
AND NEGLECTED MARYLAND CEMETERIES.
5–1002.
THERE IS A COMMISSION ON ABANDONED AND NEGLECTED MARYLAND
CEMETERIES.
5–1003.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING VOTING
MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE FROM THE ADVISORY COUNCIL ON
CEMETERY OVERSIGHT;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON
INDIAN AFFAIRS;
(III) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE;
(IV) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY
DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY THAT MAINTAINS A CEMETERY DATABASE;
(V) TWO INDIVIDUALS WITH EXPERTISE IN CEMETERY
PRESERVATION;
(VI) TWO INDIVIDUALS WITH EXPERTISE IN GENEALOGY;
(VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE BUILDING DEVELOPMENT
INDUSTRY;
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A RELIGIOUS COMMUNITY WHO
HAS KNOWLEDGE OF AND EXPERIENCE WITH CEMETERIES;
(IX) TWO INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE MEMBERS OF A CEMETERY
DESCENDANT COMMUNITY;
(X) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS EXPERIENCE IN PRESERVATION
PLANNING;

SENATE BILL 631 3
(XI) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS KNOWLEDGE OF CEMETERY
HISTORY, ARCHITECTURE, ARCHAEOLOGY, OR URBAN DESIGN; AND
(XII) ONE INDIVIDUAL FROM THE GENERAL PUBLIC.
(2) A VOTING MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION MUST BE A RESIDENT OF
THE STATE.
(3) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL COLLECTIVELY REFLECT THE GEOGRAPHIC, RACIAL, ETHNIC,
GENDER, AND CULTURAL DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(B) THE TERM OF A VOTING MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(C) A VOTING MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A VOTING MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(D) (1) (I) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ELECT THE CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE:
1. THE MANNER OF ELECTIONS OF OFFICERS; AND
2. THE DUTIES OF EACH OFFICER.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE TIMES AND PLACES OF
ITS MEETINGS.
(3) A MAJORITY OF COMMISSION MEMBERS CONSTITUTES A
QUORUM.
(4) ACTION BY THE COMMISSION REQUIRES THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE
OF A MAJORITY OF THE VOTING MEMBERS.
(E) THE OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 631
(F) THE COMMISSION MAY INCLUDE AS NONVOTING MEMBERS ANY
INTERESTED INDIVIDUAL WITH KNOWLEDGE OR EXPERTISE REGARDING
ABANDONED OR NEGLECTED CEMETERIES, CEMETERY CONSERVATION, MONUMENT
CONSTRUCTION AND REPAIR, OR CEMETERY MAINTENANCE.
5–1004.
THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH STANDARD DEFINITIONS FOR NEGLECTED AND
ABANDONED CEMETERIES;
(2) COMMUNICATE WITH COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES TO
IDENTIFY ABANDONED OR NEGLECTED CEMETERIES IN THEIR JURISDICTIONS;
(3) CONSULT WITH LOCAL JURISDICTIONS REGARDING ENABLING
LEGISLATION THAT PROVIDES CEMETERY PROTECTIONS;
(4) SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT AND ESTABLISHMENT OF A
STATEWIDE INVENTORY OF CEMETERIES AND BURIAL SITES IN THE STATE THAT
INCLUDES:
(I) INFORMATION RELATED TO ABANDONED AND NEGLECTED
MARYLAND CEMETERIES; AND
(II) A SEARCHABLE DATABASE OF INFORMATION FROM EACH
CEMETERY IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION AS ABANDONED AND NEGLECTED;
(5) PROVIDE GUIDANCE AND SUPPORT TO DESCENDANTS WHO WISH
TO IMPROVE OR MAINTAIN ABANDONED OR NEGLECTED CEMETERIES;
(6) RECOMMEND GUIDELINES FOR AND PROVIDE ADVICE REGARDING
THE REPAIR, RECONSTRUCTION, AND MAINTENANCE OF BURIAL SITES;
(7) ESTABLISH A PERMANENT PROGRAM OF BURIAL SITE
PROTECTION EDUCATION FOR DISTRIBUTION TO REALTORS, DEVELOPERS,
COMMUNITY GROUPS, LAW ENFORCEMENT, AND ANY OTHER INTERESTED PERSON;
(8) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT POLICY RECOMMENDATIONS
RELATING TO HISTORICAL CEMETERIES WITH A CONCENTRATION ON ABANDONED
OR NEGLECTED AFRICAN AMERICAN CEMETERIES;

SENATE BILL 631 5
(9) COORDINATE WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS
AND TAXATION TO ASSIGN TAX ACCOUNT RECORDS TO CEMETERIES NOT
REGISTERED WITH THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION;
(10) ENCOURAGE OWNERS OF LAND ENCOMPASSING AN ABANDONED
OR NEGLECTED CEMETERY TO ALLOW ACCESS BY A PERSON IN INTEREST IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–121 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(11) CREATE AND MAINTAIN A DIRECTORY OF PRIVATE AND PUBLIC
ORGANIZATIONS OR GOVERNMENT ENTITIES WITH INTEREST IN ACQUIRING,
REPAIRING, OR MAINTAINING ABANDONED OR NEGLECTED CEMETERIES;
(12) PROVIDE ADVICE AND SUPPORT TO ORGANIZATIONS REGARDING
THE ACQUISITION OF EQUIPMENT NECESSARY FOR THE REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE
OF ABANDONED OR NEGLECTED CEMETERIES;
(13) IDENTIFY AND CREATE CEMETERY MANAGEMENT AND
MAINTENANCE TRAINING MATERIALS AND CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS FOR
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS; AND
(14) FACILITATE CEMETERY OWNER TRANSITION FOR ABANDONED
CEMETERIES.
5–1005.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT, INCLUDING ANY FINDINGS
AND RECOMMENDATIONS, TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Subtitle [10.] 11. Termination of Title.
[5–1001.] 5–1101.
This title may be cited as the “Maryland Cemetery Act”.
[5–1002.] 5–1102.
Subject to the evaluation and reestablishment provisions of the Maryland Program
Evaluation Act, the Office of Cemetery Oversight, the provisions in this title relating to the
Office, and all regulations adopted by the Office shall terminate and be of no effect after
July 1, 2033.

SENATE BILL 631
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.